Missouri, session 2026, HB2168.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 620, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
known as section 620.4000, to read as follows:
620.4000. 1. This section shall be known and may be cited as the "Missouri
Motion Picture Rebate Incentive Program".
2. As used in this section, the following terms mean:
(1) "Department", the department of economic development;
(2) "Independent certified public accountant", any person that is in good
standing with the American Institute of Certified Public Accountants in all states in
which the person is licensed to practice accountancy;
(3) "Motion picture production company", any person, corporation,
partnership, or other business entity engaged in the business of producing a motion
picture, television program, streaming series, documentary, or commercial production,
in whole or in part, in this state;
(4) "Qualified motion picture production project", a motion picture produced
by a motion picture production company that is approved by the department and the
office of the Missouri film commission established under section 620.1210 that:
(a) Features a statement and logo designated by the department in the credits of
the completed production indicating that the production was filmed in Missouri; and
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 2168 2
(b) Is under thirty minutes in length with expected qualifying expenses in excess
of fifty thousand dollars or is over thirty minutes in length with expected qualifying
expenses in excess of one hundred thousand dollars.

Regardless of the production costs, a qualified motion picture production project shall
not include any:
a. News or current events programming;
b. Talk show;
c. Production produced primarily for industrial, corporate, or institutional
purposes, and for internal use;
d. Sports event or sports program;
e. Gala presentation or awards show;
f. Infomercial or any production that directly solicits funds;
g. Political ad; or
h. Production that is considered obscene, as defined in section 573.010;
(5) "Qualifying expenses", the sum of the total costs directly spent in this state
for the following by a motion picture production company in connection with a qualified
motion picture production project:
(a) Goods and services leased or purchased by the motion picture production
company from Missouri vendors. For goods with a purchase price of twenty-five
thousand dollars or more, the amount included in qualifying expenses shall be the
purchase price less the fair market value of the goods at the time the production is
completed;
(b) Lodging;
(c) Catering;
(d) Set construction;
(e) Compensation and wages paid by the motion picture production company on
which the motion picture production company remitted withholding payments to the
department of revenue under chapter 143 for Missouri residents. For purposes of this
section, compensation and wages paid to all above-the-line individuals shall be limited to
twenty-five percent of the overall qualifying expenses; and
(f) Post-production services.
3. (1) A motion picture production company shall submit an application for
rebate to the department on a form approved by the department. The application shall
be completed in its entirety and include the information required by the department.
(2) The department shall establish the procedures and standards for the
determination and approval of an application for rebate.

HB 2168 3
(3) The department may approve an application for rebate of up to thirty
percent of qualifying expenses incurred in this state by a motion picture production
company.
(4) The department may award an additional rebate of five percent to a motion
picture production company if the department determines that at least seventy-five
percent of the production cast and crew, excluding principal talent, are Missouri
residents, or if at least seventy-five percent of production days occur outside of the
Kansas City and St. Louis metropolitan statistical areas as delineated by the United
States Office of Management and Budget.
(5) Based upon the department's review and verification of the cost report as
indicated in subdivision (2) of subsection 6 of this section.
4. (1) The total amount of rebates authorized under this section shall not exceed
thirty-five million dollars of the moneys appropriated by the general assembly, per fiscal
year.
(2) No single qualified motion picture production project shall be eligible to
receive more than twenty-five percent of the annual appropriation cap established
under subdivision (1) of this subsection in any fiscal year.
(3) Any unused rebate funds may be carried forward and made available in the
subsequent fiscal year, provided that the annual appropriation cap established under
subdivision (1) of this subsection is not exceeded.
5. Rebates shall be considered expenditures of the state government and shall
not be deemed to be tax credits or tax expenditures.
6. (1) Each motion picture production company applying for a rebate under this
section shall submit to the department a cost report certified by an independent certified
public accountant relating to an approved qualified motion picture production project.
The cost report shall include detailed qualifying expenses that were incurred by the
motion picture production company within the twelve-month time period after
completion of the qualified motion picture production project.
(2) The department shall review the cost report submitted by the motion picture
production company, verify compliance, and issue the rebate solely based upon the
department's determination of actual qualifying expenses.
7. The department shall compile and publish a full report for submission to the
general assembly and the governor by January fifteenth of each year. The report shall
include the following:
(1) The total number of qualifying motion picture production projects approved;
(2) The total amount of qualifying expenses;
(3) The number of Missouri residents employed; and

HB 2168 4
(4) The geographic distribution of expenditures.
8. (1) There is hereby created in the state treasury the "Motion Picture
Production Fund", which shall consist of moneys, subject to appropriation by the
general assembly, for purposes set forth in this section, and any gifts, contributions,
grants, or bequests received from federal, private, or other sources. The state treasurer
shall be custodian of the fund. In accordance with sections 30.170 and 30.180, the state
treasurer may approve disbursements. The fund shall be a dedicated fund and, upon
appropriation, moneys in this fund shall be used solely as provided in this section.
(2) Notwithstanding the provisions of section 33.080 to the contrary, any moneys
100 remaining in the fund at the end of the biennium shall not revert to the credit of the
101 general revenue fund.
102 (3) The state treasurer shall invest moneys in the fund in the same manner as
103 other funds are invested. Any interest and moneys earned on such investments shall be
104 credited to the fund.
105 9. The department may promulgate all necessary rules and regulations for the
106 administration of this section including, but not limited to, application procedures,
107 auditing requirements, and standards for verifying qualifying expenses. Any rule or
108 portion of a rule, as that term is defined in section 536.010, that is created under the
109 authority delegated in this section shall become effective only if it complies with and is
110 subject to all of the provisions of chapter 536 and, if applicable, section 536.028. This
111 section and chapter 536 are nonseverable and if any of the powers vested with the
112 general assembly pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to delay the effective date, or to
113 disapprove and annul a rule are subsequently held unconstitutional, then the grant of
114 rulemaking authority and any rule proposed or adopted after August 28, 2026, shall be
115 invalid and void.
116 10. (1) The provisions of this section shall expire on December 31, 2036, unless
117 reauthorized by the general assembly.
118 (2) Applications for rebate approved by the department prior to December 31,
119 2036, may receive rebates under this section, provided that the qualifying expenses are
120 completed and submitted to the department before December 31, 2037.
121 11. The provisions of this section shall become effective beginning on July 1,
122 2027.
✔